Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
22-3-902. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Arkansas Justice Building” means any building constructed or purchased and renovated through the issuance of bonds under §22-3-908 for the purpose of housing any of the agencies of the Arkansas judiciary as described in §22-3-923(b)(1); and

(2)

“Construction” means the initial construction and equipment of the Arkansas Justice Building and any subsequent reconstruction, equipment, extension, or improvement of the Arkansas Justice Building.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 22, as added by Acts 1973, No. 632, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-621; Acts 2011, No. 191, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote this section.

22-3-903. Construction.

(a)

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intent and purposes thereof and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of its purposes. To this end, it shall not be necessary to comply with general provisions of other laws dealing with public facilities, their acquisition, construction, leasing, encumbering, or disposition.

(b)

The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, and thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, or things.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 21; 1973, No. 632, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-620.

22-3-904. Arkansas Justice Building Commission — Creation — Members — Meetings. [Abolished.]

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 235, § 1 provided:

“The Justice Building Commission created by Arkansas Code §22-3-904 is hereby abolished and all of its powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds are hereby transferred to the Arkansas State Building Services created by Arkansas Code §22-2-104.”

The section was derived from Acts 1955, No. 375, §§ 2-6, 8; 1963, No. 513, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-602 — 5-606, 5-608.

22-3-905. Duties and powers of Building Authority Division generally.

It shall be the function, power, and duty of the Building Authority Division to:

(1)

Equip the Arkansas Justice Building and any extensions thereof;

(2)

Have exclusive jurisdiction over the operation of the building, including, without limiting the generality of this grant, the execution of lease agreements covering the leasing of space in the building in such form, for such terms, with such provisions, for such amounts, and with such parties, including, but not limited to, state agencies, as the division shall determine;

(3)

Purchase, lease, or rent any corporeal or personal property;

(4)

Receive bequests or donations of any real, corporeal, or personal property;

(5)

Sell, barter, lease, or rent any real, corporeal, or personal property, or convert into money any property which cannot be used in the form received;

(6)

Establish accounts in one (1) or more banks, and thereafter, from time to time, make deposits into and withdrawals from those accounts;

(7)

Contract and be contracted with; and

(8)

Take such other action, not inconsistent with law, as it may deem necessary or desirable to carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-607; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 41; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 41; 2019, No. 910, § 6188.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of Arkansas Justice Building Commission to Arkansas Building Authority, see Publisher's Note at beginning of this subchapter.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the section heading and the introductory language; and substituted “the division” for “the authority” in (2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language.

22-3-906. Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall be the custodian of all property held in the name of the Building Authority Division, shall be its disbursing agent and executive officer, and shall administer the provisions of this subchapter and the rules and orders established thereunder.

(b)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall employ such assistants and other personnel as are, in his or her opinion, necessary to properly administer the provisions of this subchapter.

(c)(1)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall furnish bond to the state, with a corporate surety thereon, in the penal sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform his or her duties and properly account for all funds received and disbursed by him or her.

(2)

An additional disbursing agent's bond shall not be required of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, and the bond so furnished shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, and an executed counterpart thereof shall be filed with the Auditor of State.

(3)

The premium on the bond shall be a proper charge against the funds under the control of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-609; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 42; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 42; 2019, No. 315, § 2359; 2019, No. 910, § 6189.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of Arkansas Justice Building Commission to Arkansas Building Authority, see Publisher's Note at beginning of this subchapter.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the section heading and in (a); substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “authority” in (a); deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; deleted “subject to the approval of the authority” in present (b); and substituted “the director” for “the authority” in (c)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in the section heading and in (a); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “director” in (b), (c)(1), (c)(2), and (c)(3).

22-3-907. Financing authority of Building Authority Division.

The Building Authority Division is authorized and empowered to enter into the necessary contracts for the borrowing of all funds that it determines will be required in connection with the financing of the Arkansas Justice Building or the construction of extensions, additions, or improvements thereto. The cost of construction may include architectural, engineering, legal, and other similar expenses.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 43; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 43; 2019, No. 910, § 6190.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of Arkansas Justice Building Commission to Arkansas Building Authority, see Publisher's Note at beginning of this subchapter.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the section heading and the section.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the section heading and in the text.

22-3-908. Bonds — Issuance and terms.

(a)

In evidence of loans of funds, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority is authorized and empowered to issue its bonds at one (1) time or in series from time to time, as provided in this section, and to use the proceeds thereof, together with other available funds, for defraying the costs of accomplishing the construction of the Arkansas Justice Building, together with all expenses incidental to and reasonably necessary in connection therewith, for paying the expenses of the issuance of the bonds; for the creation of a reserve for contingencies to secure the payment of the bonds, if the authority deems it necessary or desirable; and for providing for the payment of interest on the bonds, if necessary, until sufficient funds are available.

(b)(1)

The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority.

(2)

The bonds may be issued at one (1) time or in series from time to time, and the authorizing resolution may control any priority between or among successive series or issues.

(3)

The bonds:

(A)

May be coupon bonds, payable to bearer, or may be registrable as to principal only or as to both principal and interest;

(B)

May be in such form and denomination;

(C)

May have such date or dates;

(D)

May be stated to mature at such times, not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof;

(E)

May bear interest payable at such times and at such rate or rates, provided that no bond may bear interest at a rate exceeding eight percent (8%) per annum;

(F)

May be made payable at such place or places within or without the State of Arkansas;

(G)

May be made subject to such terms of redemption in advance of maturity at such prices; and

(H)

May contain such other terms and conditions,

all as the authority shall determine.

(4)

The bonds shall have all the qualities of negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas, subject to provisions as to registration of ownership, as set forth in subdivision (b)(3) of this section.

(c)

The authorizing resolution may contain any other terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed desirable, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the maintenance of various funds and reserves, the nature and extent of the security, the custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds, the collection and disposition of revenues, the issuance of additional bonds, and the nature of the pledge and security, whether parity or priority, in that event, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority and of the holders and registered owners of the bonds as the authority shall determine.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; 1973, No. 632, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1985, No. 1062, § 24, provided in part that the authority of the Justice Building Commission to issue revenue bonds pursuant to Acts 1955, No. 375, was transferred to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and that from May 1, 1985, the issuer of revenue bonds pursuant to Acts 1955, No. 375 means the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

22-3-909. Bonds — Trust indenture.

The authorizing resolution may provide for the execution by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority with a bank or trust company within or without the State of Arkansas of a trust indenture which may contain any terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed desirable by the authority, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the maintenance of various funds and reserves, the nature and extent of the security, the custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds, the collection and disposition of revenues, the issuance of additional bonds, and the nature of the pledge and security, whether parity or priority, in that event, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority, of the trustee, and of the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; 1973, No. 632, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-3-908.

22-3-910. Bonds — Sale and execution.

(a)(1)

The bonds shall be sold at public sale on sealed bids.

(2)

Notice of the sale shall be published one (1) time a week for at least two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the City of Little Rock, and having a general circulation throughout the State of Arkansas, with the first publication to be at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of sale.

(3)

The bonds may be sold at such price as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority may accept, including sale at a discount, but in no event shall any bid be accepted which results in an interest cost to be computed by counting the amount of any discount as interest which is in excess of the interest cost computed at par for eight percent (8%) per annum bonds.

(4)

The award, if made, shall be to the bidder whose bid results in the lowest net interest cost, determined by computing the aggregate interest cost at the rate bid, deducting the amount of any premium bid, then adding the amount of any discount bid.

(b)(1)

The bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the Chair of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and by the manual signature of the Secretary of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

(2)

The coupons attached to the bonds shall be executed by the facsimile signature of the Chair of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

(3)

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds or coupons, their signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes.

(4)

The authority shall adopt and use a seal in the execution and issuance of the bonds, and each bond shall be sealed with the seal of the authority.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; 1973, No. 632, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-3-908.

22-3-911. Bonds — Pledge of revenues — Restrictions.

(a)

The bonds and interest thereon shall be payable solely from and secured by a pledge of the gross revenues in the Justice Building Fund, which revenues are specifically declared to be cash funds, restricted in their use, and dedicated solely for the purposes set forth in this subchapter. The Arkansas Development Finance Authority is authorized and empowered to make a pledge of the gross revenues in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(b)

The bonds shall be general obligations only of the authority, and in no event shall they constitute an indebtedness for which the faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or any of its revenues are pledged.

(c)

No member of the authority shall be personally liable on the bonds, or for any damages sustained by anyone in connection with the contracts for loans or construction of the Arkansas Justice Building, unless it shall be made to appear that he or she has acted with a corrupt intent.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-3-908.

22-3-912. Bonds — Actions for enforcement.

Any covenants and agreements entered into by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall be binding in all respects upon the authority and its successors in accordance with the terms of those covenants and agreements, and all of the provisions thereof shall be enforceable by appropriate proceedings at law or in equity or otherwise.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-3-908.

22-3-913. Bonds — Tax exemptions.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter shall be exempt from all taxes, state, county, and municipal. This exemption shall include income taxation and inheritance taxation.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615.

Publisher's Notes.

This section was declared unconstitutional by McArthur v. Smallwood, 225 Ark. 328, 281 S.W.2d 428 (1955) insofar as it relates to exemption from property taxation.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-3-908.

22-3-914. Refunding bonds — Issuance.

(a)

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority may issue bonds under this subchapter for the purpose of refunding any obligation of the authority issued under this subchapter at a rate or rates of interest not exceeding the maximum rate otherwise authorized under this subchapter. The authority may authorize and deliver a single issue of bonds under this subchapter in part for the purpose of refunding such obligations and in part for the purpose of constructing extensions, additions, or improvements to the Arkansas Justice Building.

(b)(1)

When bonds are issued under this section for refunding purposes, the bonds may either be sold or delivered in exchange for the outstanding obligations.

(2)

If sold, the proceeds may be either applied to the payment of the obligations refunded or deposited in escrow for the retirement thereof.

(c)

All bonds issued under this section shall in all respects be authorized, issued, and secured in the manner provided for other bonds issued under this subchapter and shall have all the attributes of such bonds.

(d)

The authority may provide that any refunding bonds shall have the same priority of lien on the revenues pledged for their payment as was enjoyed by the obligations refunded thereby.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-615.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-3-908.

22-3-915. Investment by Arkansas retirement systems.

The board of trustees of any retirement system created by the General Assembly may, in its discretion, invest its funds in the bonds of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority issued under the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-616.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-3-908.

22-3-916. Audit of accounts — Reports.

The agency of the state authorized by law to audit the records and accounts of the various state agencies is authorized and directed to audit the records and accounts of the Building Authority Division and to furnish a copy of the report thereof to the division and to the trustee for the bondholders.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-617; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 44; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 44; 2019, No. 910, § 6191.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of Arkansas Justice Building Commission to Arkansas Building Authority, see Publisher's Note at beginning of this subchapter.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” and “the division” for “the authority”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-3-917. Employment of architect — Fees.

(a)(1)

The Building Authority Division may employ an architect to prepare plans, specifications, and estimates of cost for the construction of the Arkansas Justice Building and to supervise and inspect the construction.

(2)

The division and the architect shall consult with the members of the Supreme Court concerning the plans and specifications for the construction.

(b)(1)

The fees or commissions of the architect shall not exceed six percent (6%) of the total construction cost, and none of the fees or commissions are due and payable until the construction contracts are awarded and then only to the extent of sixty percent (60%) of the total amount of the fees or commissions.

(2)

The remainder of the architect's fees or commissions are due and payable as the construction work progresses.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-618; Acts 2011, No. 191, § 2; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 45; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 45; 2019, No. 910, § 6192.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of Arkansas Justice Building Commission to Arkansas Building Authority, see Publisher's Note at beginning of this subchapter.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “consult” for “advise” and deleted “the Attorney General, the Workers' Compensation Commission, and the Arkansas Public Service Commission” following “Supreme Court”.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(1); and substituted “the division” for “the authority” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1).

22-3-918. Notice for bids for construction — Bonds — Execution of contracts.

(a)(1)

After the Building Authority Division has approved the plans and specifications prepared by the architect, it shall proceed to advertise for bids for the construction of the Arkansas Justice Building.

(2)

The notice shall be published one (1) time each week for not less than three (3) consecutive weeks in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation published in the City of Little Rock, and in such other newspapers and trade or construction journals as may, in the opinion of the division, be desirable.

(3)

The notice shall provide for the receipt of sealed bids, shall set forth the time and place at which the bids will be received, shall give the name and address of the architect from whom copies of plans, specifications, and drafts of the proposed contract to be entered into with the successful bidder may be obtained, and shall contain any other information and requirements as, in the opinion of the division, may be necessary or desirable.

(b)(1)

On the date and time fixed in the notice, the division shall open, tabulate, and compare the bids and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(2)

The division shall have the right to reject any or all bids.

(c)

The successful bidder shall be required to furnish bonds to the State of Arkansas for the use and benefit of the division, with a corporate guaranty of indemnity sureties thereon. Bond shall be both for the completion of the construction free of all liens and encumbrances in an amount fixed by the division and for the protection of the division and its members against all liability for injury to person or damage to or loss of property arising or claimed to have arisen in the course of the construction, within limits fixed by the division.

(d)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall execute all contracts awarded by the division.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-619; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 46; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 46; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6193, 6194.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the division” for “the authority” throughout the section; substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(1); substituted “division” for “commission” at the end of (c); and substituted “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “chairman and secretary, acting on behalf of the authority” in (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (d).

22-3-919. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Justice Building Fund, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 1223, § 12. The section was derived from Acts 1955, No. 375, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-614.

22-3-920. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning special costs assessed and remittance to the commission, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1955, No. 375, § 14; 1973, No. 632, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-613; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 2.

22-3-921. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the lease to the Workers' Compensation Commission, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 191, §
3. The section was derived from Acts 1955, No. 375, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-611; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 3.

22-3-922. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, Acts 2011, No. 191, contained two sections designated as § 4.

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the lease to the Arkansas Public Service Commission, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 191, §
4[5]. The section was derived from Acts 1955, No. 375, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-612; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 4.

22-3-923. Allocation of space — Legislative findings and determination — Purpose and intent.

(a)(1)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

(A)

The Arkansas Justice Building was constructed primarily to house the higher appellate courts and that other agencies were permitted to occupy portions of the building only because the space was not needed by the courts at that time;

(B)

Since construction of the building, the electors of the state authorized the establishment of a new appellate court, the Court of Appeals;

(C)

The Court of Appeals is in urgent need of additional space in the Arkansas Justice Building in order to perform its responsibilities; and

(D)

It is essential that the additional space to be provided the Court of Appeals is contiguous to the space now assigned to that court.

(2)

Furthermore, it is the purpose and intent of this section to establish specific priorities for use of space in the Arkansas Justice Building and to specifically authorize the Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration to allocate space in the Arkansas Justice Building in accordance with those priorities to assure that the appellate courts and the services and facilities essential to the effective and efficient operation of the courts, such as library facilities, are given first priority in the use of space in the building.

(b)(1)

Space in the Arkansas Justice Building shall be allocated by the division, after seeking the advice of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities, to the following courts, library, and offices in the order of priority listed:

(A)

The Supreme Court;

(B)

The Court of Appeals;

(C)

The Clerk of the Supreme Court;

(D)

The Supreme Court Library; and

(E)

The Administrative Office of the Courts.

(2)

The space requirements of each court, library, or office listed in this subsection must be adequately met before any space is allocated to any other office or agency.

(c)

If the space requirements of the courts, library, and offices listed in subsection (b) of this section are adequately met, the division, after seeking the advice of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities, may allocate any additional space to any other offices or agencies it deems appropriate.

(d)

The division shall allocate space in accordance with the priorities prescribed in this section as soon as practicable after April 3, 1985, in order that the additional space allocated to the courts, library, and offices enumerated in this section shall be available on or before July 1, 1985.

(e)(1)

The provisions of §§22-3-901 —22-3-918 and the covenants and obligations of the division entered into in connection with the issuance of bonds under §§22-3-901 —22-3-918 are ratified and confirmed.

(2)

Nothing in this section is intended or shall be interpreted to alter the amounts of, due dates for, or obligors of lease rentals payable pursuant to leases entered into between the division and any lessee identified in §§22-3-901 —22-3-918 or any successor thereto, or to alter the handling, deposit, or application of the lease rentals.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 791, §§ 1-6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-622 — 5-627; Acts 2003, No. 364, § 15; 2011, No. 191, § 4[5]; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 47; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 47.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, Acts 2011, No. 191, contained two sections designated as § 4.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of Arkansas Justice Building Commission to Arkansas Building Authority, see Publisher's Note at beginning of this subchapter.

The powers and duties of the Arkansas Transportation Commission were transferred to the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department pursuant to Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 153, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment added subdivision designations in (a)(1) and made related changes; in (a)(2), substituted “Furthermore” for “Further” and “Arkansas Building Authority” for “Arkansas Justice Building Commission”; rewrote (b) and (c); substituted “authority” for “Arkansas Justice Building Commission” in (d); deleted former (e) through (g); redesignated former (h) as present (e); substituted “§§22-3-901—22-3-918,22-3-921, and22-3-922” for “§§22-3-901 —22-3-922” in (e)(1) and (2); substituted “authority” for “Arkansas Justice Building Commission” in (e)(1); substituted “authority” for “commission” in (e)(2); and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2011 amendment deleted “22-3-921, and 22-3-922” following “22-3-918” in (e)(1) and (2).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the division” for “the authority” throughout the section; substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(2).